Massachusetts, session 194th, S2304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (d) of section 83C of chapter 169 of the acts of 2008, as
appearing in section 12 of chapter 188 of the acts of 2016, is hereby amended by striking out the
fifth clause and inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
(5) require that offshore wind energy generating resources to be used by a developer
under the proposal meet the following criteria: (i) provide enhanced electricity reliability; (ii)
contribute to reducing winter electricity price spikes; (iii) are cost effective to electric ratepayers
in the commonwealth over the term of the contract, taking into consideration potential economic
and environmental benefits to the ratepayers; (iv) avoid line loss and mitigate transmission costs
to the extent possible and ensure that transmission cost overruns, if any, are not borne by
ratepayers; (v) adequately demonstrate project viability in a commercially reasonable timeframe;
(vii) allow offshore wind energy generation resources to be paired with energy storage systems;
(viii) mitigate environmental impacts, marine mammal mortality, and disruptions to existing
commercial fishing grounds; (xi) provide a bond or other security to ensure decommissioning or
of 2

environmental remediation costs from mechanical failure, storm-related damage, or the end of
useful life will not be borne by ratepayers, the commonwealth, or its subdivisions, and (xii)
where feasible, create and foster employment and economic development in the commonwealth.
SECTION 2. The department of public utilities shall promulgate updated regulations in
accordance with section 1 no later than 180 days following passage of this act.
of 2